Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3321
License holder; written confirmation of compliance; reinstatement or renewal of license; fee.

(1) Upon presentation by the license holder of a written confirmation of compliance to the Department of Motor Vehicles, the license holder may have his or her operator's license reinstated upon payment of a reinstatement fee of fifty dollars. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(2) Upon presentation by the license holder of a written confirmation of compliance to the relevant licensing authority and upon payment of any fee which may be prescribed by the relevant licensing authority, the license holder may have his or her professional, occupational, or recreational license reinstated or renewed. The professional, occupational, or recreational license may be automatically reinstated or renewed pursuant to the relevant licensing authority's least restrictive reinstatement or renewal procedure applicable to license suspension, probation, or other licensing authority disciplinary action, except that the license holder must meet any other customary or standard requirement for reinstatement or renewal as required by the relevant licensing authority.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 21;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 3.